dictsource/mr_rules
// Marathi Language.
// This mr_rules file is prepared by Maheshinder Singh Khosla< mahesh.khosla@gmail.com >.

// This file is UTF8 encoded

// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs

// conditional rules
// ?2   use diphthong for "ai"
// ?3   use diphthong for "au"


// Schwa kept or dropped: corrections learned from WikiPron on top of the
// phoneme table's own schwa deletion.
// The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group are not
// hand-written: android/tools/schwa learns them (rule induction on 80% of
// the words) and writes them here. On the 20% it never saw, inherent vowels
// kept or dropped right went from 87.6% to 92.1% (61 fixed, 19 broken).
// Regenerate them with those tools rather than editing by hand.
// L20 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except अ);
// L21 = consonant letters; L22 = any Devanagari letter; L23 = ं ँ;
// L24 = independent vowels except अ (what can follow a consonant's own vowel).
.L20 ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ
.L21 क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़
.L22 ऄ अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह ़ ऽ ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ ् क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ ं ँ ः
.L24 आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ ॠ ॡ
.L23 ं ँ

.replace
 ०	0
 १	1
 २	2
 ३	3
 ४	4
 ५	5
 ६	6
 ७	7
 ८	8
 ९	9

// combine dot consonants into a single character
क़	क़
ख़	ख़
ग़	ग़
ज़	ज़
ड़	ड़
ढ़	ढ़
फ़	फ़
य़	य़	

// Vowels

.group अ
        अ          V
        अ (ह       E         //  (h
    अह) अ          E

.group आ
        आ          a:
        आं          a~

.group इ
        इ          I
        इ (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens in Marathi; secondary
                             // stress (not primary) needed so ph_hindi_base's
                             // i: phoneme doesn't self-demote back to plain i
                             // when this syllable isn't the word's own
                             // stressed one - see hi_rules for the same fix
//       इँ        i~
        इं        i~

.group ई
        ई          i:
        ई (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long in Marathi; was plain
                             // "i" (word-final SHORTENING, backwards) before
                             // this - see .group इ above for why the stress
                             // mark matters

.group उ
        उ          U
        उ (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; no stress mark needed
                             // here - u: has no self-demotion guard (see
                             // hi_rules)

.group ऊ
        ऊ          u
        ऊं          u~        // + anusvara
        ऊँ (_       u~        // + candrabinbu

.group ऋ
        ऋ          rU

.group ऌ
        ऌ          l-        // vocalic l

.group ऍ
        ऍ          E         // candra e

.group ऎ
        ऎ          e
        ऎं          e~
        ऎँ (_       e~

.group ए
        ए          e:
        एँ          e~:
        एं          e~:
    ा) एँ (_       j

.group ऐ
        ऐ          aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
        ऐं          aI~
        ऐँ (_       aI~



.group ऑ
        ऑ          O         // candra O

.group ऒ
        ऒ          o
        ऒं          o~
        ऒँ (_       o~

.group ओ
        ओ          o:
        ओं          o~        // +anusvara
        ओँ (_       o~        // +candrabindu
    ा) ओं (_       w        // +anusvara
    ा) ओँ (_       w
    

.group औ
        औ          aU        // ?? [aU] [O:]
        औं          aU~        // +anusvara
        औँ (_       aU~        // +candrabindu



// Vowel Signs

.group ा
ा	#X2a:
   C) ा      a:
C)        ा (ँ       a~
C)        ाँ (_      a~
C)        ां         a~


.group ि
ि	#X1I
C)        ि          I
C)        ि (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens; see .group इ above
C)//      िँ       i~
C)        िं       i~

.group ी
ी	#X2i:
C)        ी          i:
C)        ी (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long; see .group इ above
C)        ी (ँ       i~
C)        ीँ (_      i~
C)        ीं         i~

.group ु
ु	#X1U
C)        ु          U
C)        ु (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; see .group उ above
C)        ु (ँ       u~
C)        ुं         u~
C)        ुँ (_      u~

.group ू
ू	#X2u:
C)        ू          u:
C)        ू (ँ       u~
C)        ूं         u~        // or O~   ??
C)        ूँ (_      u~

.group ृ
ृ	#X1rU
C)        ृ          rU

.group ॄ
ॄ	#X1ru
C)        ॄ          ru

.group ॅ
ॅ	#X1E
C)        ॅ          E

.group ॆ
ॆ	#X1e
C)        ॆ          e
C)        ॆ (ँ       e~
C)        ॆं         e~
C)        ॆँ (_      e~

.group े
े	#X2e:
C)        े          e:
C)        े (ँ       e~
C)        ें         e~:
C)        ेँ (_      e~:

.group ै
ै	#X2aI
C)        ै          aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
C)        ैं         aI~ 
C)        ै (ँ       aI~ 
C)        ैं         aI~
C)        ैँ (_      aI~

.group ॉ
ॉ	#X1O
C)        ॉ          O

.group ॊ
ॊ	#X1o
C)        ॊ          o
C)        ॊ (ँ       o~
C)        ॊं         o~
C)        ॊँ (_      o~

.group ो
ो	#X2o:
C)        ो          o:
C)        ो (ँ       o~
C)        ों         o~
C)        ोँ (_      o~

.group ौ
ौ	#X2aU
C)        ौ          aU        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ौ (ँ       aU~        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ौं         aU~
C)        ौँ (_      aU~

.group ॢ     // vowel sign l
ॢ 	#X1l-
C)        ॢ          l-

.group ॣ    // vowel sign ll
ॣ	#X2l-:
C)        ॣ          l-:

.group ॐ
ॐ	o~m



// // Consonants

.group क
        क          kV
        _L23) क (L21_            k@4      // generated
        _L23) क (L21L22_         k@4      // generated
        _L23) क (L21             k@4      // generated
        _L22L23) क (L21_         k@4      // generated
        _L22L23) क (L21L22_      k@4      // generated
        _L22L23) क (L21          k@4      // generated
        L23) क (L21_             k@4      // generated
        L23) क (L21L22_          k@4      // generated
        L23) क (L21              k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21_              k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21L22_           k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21               k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21_           k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21L22_        k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21            k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21_               k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21L22_            k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21                k@4      // generated
        _L21L23) क (L21L20_      k        // generated
        _L21L23) क (L21L20       k        // generated
        L21L23) क (L21L20_       k        // generated
        L21L23) क (L21L20        k        // generated
        _L22) क (L21्_           k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L21्            k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21्_        k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21्         k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21्_            k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21्             k@4      // generated
        _ा) क (L21L21_           k        // generated
        _L22ा) क (L21L21_        k        // generated
        ा) क (L21L21_            k        // generated
        _L21) क (L21L22्         k        // generated
        _L22L21) क (L21L22्      k        // generated
        L21) क (L21L22्          k        // generated
        _L22) क (L24_            k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L24L22_         k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L24             k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L24_         k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L24L22_      k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L24          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L24_             k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L24L22_          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L24              k@4      // generated
        _L20) क (L21L23_         k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21L23          k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L23_      k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L23       k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L23_          k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L23           k        // generated
        _L22) क (L21L22L23       k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21L22L23    k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21L22L23        k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L21_            k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21_         k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21_             k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23_            k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23L22_         k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23             k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23_         k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23L22_      k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23_             k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23L22_          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23              k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L21L22ण         k        // generated
        _L22) क (लL21_           k        // generated
        _L22L22) क (लL21_        k        // generated
        L22) क (लL21_            k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21ण_           k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21ण_        k        // generated
        L20) क (L21ण_            k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21L22्         k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L22्      k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L22्          k        // generated
        क (B       k
        क (्य      k:
        क़         qV
        क़ (B      q
